Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-135
State budget; departmental needs; duty to supply information requested by Governor.

The departments, offices and institutions, and other agencies, shall upon request of the Governor furnish him any additional information which he may desire relative to their estimated requirements, expenditures or receipts.

Laws 1921, c. 210, § 11, p. 749;

C.S.1922, § 7278;

C.S.1929, § 81-311;

R.S.1943, § 81-135.